Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-803
Exemptions.

(1) The following shall be exempt from the Credit Services Organization Act:

(a) A person authorized to make loans or extensions of credit under the laws of this state or the United States who is subject to regulation and supervision by this state or the United States or a lender approved by the United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development for participation in a mortgage insurance program under the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1701 et seq.;

(b) A bank or savings and loan association whose deposit or accounts are eligible for insurance by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a subsidiary of such a bank or savings and loan association;

(c) A credit union doing business in this state;

(d) A nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(e) A person licensed as a real estate broker or salesperson under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act acting within the course and scope of that license;

(f) A person licensed to practice law in this state acting within the course and scope of the person's practice as an attorney;

(g) A broker-dealer registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission or the Commodity Futures Trading Commission acting within the course and scope of that regulation;

(h) A consumer reporting agency;

(i) A person whose primary business is making loans secured by liens on real property;

(j) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed as a collection agency in this state or a person holding a solicitor's certificate in this state acting within the course and scope of that license or certificate; and

(k) A person licensed to engage in the business of debt management pursuant to sections 69-1201 to 69-1217.

(2) The burden of proving an exemption under this section shall be on the person claiming the exemption.

Laws 1991, LB 292, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 50.

For provisions on licensing of collection agencies and solicitors, see Chapter 45, article 6.

Nebraska Real Estate License Act, see section 81-885.